Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-361
Department of Revenue; functions and goals.

The functions and goals of the Department of Revenue shall be to: (1) Execute faithfully the revenue and property tax laws of the State of Nebraska; (2) provide for efficient, updated, and economical methods and systems of revenue accounting, reporting, enforcement, and related activities; and (3) continually seek to improve its system of administration to provide greater efficiency and convenience to this state's taxpayers.

Laws 1980, LB 834, § 2;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 23.